District of Columbia statutes.
28:2-203

Seals inoperative.

The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a contract for sale or an offer to buy or sell goods does not constitute the writing a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to such a contract or offer.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2-203.
1973 Ed., § 28:2-203.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: Section 3, Uniform Sales Act.

Changes: Portion pertaining to “seals” rewritten.

Purposes of Changes: 1. This section makes it clear that every effect of the seal which relates to “sealed instruments” as such is wiped out insofar as contracts for sale are concerned. However, the substantial effects of a seal, except extension of the period of limitations, may be had by appropriate drafting as in the case of firm offers (see Section 2-205).

2. This section leaves untouched any aspects of a seal which relate merely to signatures or to authentication of execution and the like. Thus, a statute providing that a purported signature gives prima facie evidence of its own authenticity or that a signature gives prima facie evidence of consideration is still applicable to sales transactions even though a seal may be held to be a signature within the meaning of such a statute. Similarly, the authorized affixing of a corporate seal bearing the corporate name to a contractual writing purporting to be made by the corporation may have effect as a signature without any reference to the law of sealed instruments.

Cross Reference: Point 1: Section 2-205.

Definitional Cross References: “Contract for sale”. Section 2-106.

“Goods”. Section 2-105.

“Writing”. Section 1-201.